Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1602
Organization with temporary board of trustees; procedure; contracts of temporary board; duties of county board.

Whenever the petition mentioned in subsection (1) of section 39-1601 shall (1) be signed by twenty percent of the landowners within the proposed limits of any such district, (2) contain a list of five legal voters who are owners of property and reside in the proposed district, (3) contain a request that the county board appoint from this list a temporary board of three trustees, and (4) authorize the board to (a) consult with and employ competent independent engineers as to the cost and feasibility of the construction of improvements, (b) consult with other firms or authorities on the feasibility of financing such improvements, and (c) enter into such contracts with attorneys and others which, in the judgment of the temporary board, are necessary in order to properly present the question of formation of the district to the voters therein, the county board shall give notice, by posting such notice in three conspicuous places in the district, that such a petition has been filed and that a temporary board will be appointed as requested. Such notice shall remain posted for ten days, contain the entire wording of the petition, and advise that if fifty percent of the property owners within the proposed district shall file written objections within ten days from the date the notice is first posted, objecting to the appointment of such a temporary board, no board shall be appointed; Provided, any such contract entered into by the temporary board shall be binding upon the board of trustees subsequently elected, in accordance with sections 39-1605 and 39-1606, but shall not be binding on the county or counties wherein the district is located if the district is not created. On the date recommended by the temporary board of trustees, the county board of the county, where the petition was filed, shall call a special election as provided in section 39-1605.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. III, § 2, p. 525.